 UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 10-Q QUARTERLY REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 For the Quarterly Period Ended June 30, 2018 or TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 For the Transition Period from ____ to ____ Commission file number 1-7657 AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Registrant s telephone number, including area code (212) 640-2000 Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report. Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes No Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate website, if any, every Interactive Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T ( 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files). Yes No Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of large accelerated filer, accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, and emerging growth company in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes No Indicate the number of shares outstanding of each of the issuer s classes of common stock, as of the latest practicable date. Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY FORM 10-Q INDEX Table of Contents PART I. FINANCIAL INFORMATION °Item 1. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 1 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 2 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 3 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 4 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS (Unaudited) See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. 5 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 1. Basis of Presentation The Company American Express Company is a globally integrated payments company that provides customers with access to products, insights and experiences that enrich lives and build business success. Our principal products and services are charge and credit payment card products and travel-related services offered to consumers and businesses around the world. Business travel-related services are offered through the non-consolidated joint venture, American Express Global Business Travel (the GBT JV). Our various products and services are sold globally to diverse customer groups, including consumers, small businesses, mid-sized companies and large corporations. These products and services are sold through various channels, including mobile and online applications, direct mail, in-house sales teams, third-party vendors and direct response advertising. Effective for the second quarter of 2018, we realigned our reportable operating segments to reflect the organizational changes announced during the first quarter of 2018. Prior periods have been revised to conform to the new reportable segments, which are as follows: Corporate functions and certain other businesses and operations are included in Corporate Other. The accompanying Consolidated Financial Statements should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements included in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017 (the Annual Report). If not materially different, certain footnote disclosures included therein have been omitted from this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q. The interim consolidated financial information in this report has not been audited. In the opinion of management, all adjustments, which consist of normal recurring adjustments necessary for a fair statement of the interim period consolidated financial information, have been made. Results of operations reported for interim periods are not necessarily indicative of results for the entire year. The preparation of Consolidated Financial Statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (GAAP) requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and the disclosures of contingent assets and liabilities. These accounting estimates reflect the best judgment of management, but actual results could differ. Discount Revenue Discount revenue primarily represents the amount we earn on transactions occurring at merchants that have entered into a card acceptance agreement with us, or a Global Network Services (GNS) partner or other third-party merchant acquirer, for facilitating transactions between the merchants and Card Members. The amount of fees charged, or merchant discount, varies with, among other factors, the industry in which the merchant conducts business, the merchant s overall transaction volume, the timing and method of payment to the merchant, the method of submission of transactions and, in certain instances, the geographic scope of the card acceptance agreement signed with us (e.g., local or global) and the transaction amount. The merchant discount is generally deducted from the payment to the merchant and recorded as discount revenue at the time the Card Member transaction occurs. 6 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The card acceptance agreements, which outline the agreed-upon terms for charging the merchant discount fee, vary in duration. Our contracts with small- and medium-sized merchants generally have no fixed contractual duration, while those with large merchants are generally for fixed periods, which typically range from three to seven years in duration. Our fixed-period agreements may include auto-renewal features, which may allow the existing terms to continue beyond the stated expiration date until a new agreement is reached. We satisfy our obligations under these agreements over the contract term, often on a daily basis, through the processing of Card Member transactions and the availability of our payment network. In cases where the merchant acquirer is a third party (which is the case, for example, under our OptBlue program, or with certain of our GNS partners), we receive a network rate fee in our settlement with the merchant acquirer, which is individually negotiated between us and that merchant acquirer and is recorded as discount revenue at the time the Card Member transaction occurs. In our role as the operator of the American Express network, we also settle with merchants on behalf of our GNS card issuing partners, who in turn receive an issuer rate that is individually negotiated between that issuer and us and is recorded as expense in Marketing and business development (see below) or as contra-revenue in Other revenue. In contrast with networks such as those operated by Visa Inc. and Mastercard Incorporated, there are no collectively set interchange rates or network rates on the American Express network, and no fees are agreed or due between the GNS partners on the network. Net Card Fees Net card fees represent revenue earned from annual card membership fees, which vary based on the type of card and the number of cards for each account. These fees, net of acquisition costs and a reserve for projected refunds for Card Member cancellations, are deferred and recognized on a straight-line basis over the twelve-month card membership period as Net Card Fees in the Consolidated Statements of Income. The unamortized net card fee balance is reported in Other Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Other Fees and Commissions Other fees and commissions includes certain fees charged to Card Members, including delinquency fees and foreign currency conversion fees, which are primarily recognized in the period in which they are charged to the Card Member. Other fees and commissions also includes Membership Rewards program fees, which are deferred and recognized over the period covered by the fee, typically one year, the unamortized portion of which is included in Other Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. In addition, Other fees and commissions includes loyalty coalition-related fees, travel commissions and fees and service fees earned from merchants, that are recognized when the service is performed, which is generally in the period the fee is charged. Refer to Note 13 for additional information. Contra-revenue P ayments made through contractual arrangements with our merchants, GNS partners, and other customers are classified as expense where we receive goods, services or other benefits, for which the fair value is determinable and measurable. If these conditions are not met, the payment is classified as contra-revenue with the related revenue transaction (e.g., Discount revenue or Other revenue) and recorded when incurred. Interest Income Interest on Card Member loans is assessed using the average daily balance method. Unless the loan is classified as non-accrual, interest is recognized based upon the principal amount outstanding, in accordance with the terms of the applicable account agreement, until the outstanding balance is paid, or written off. Interest and dividends on investment securities primarily relate to our performing fixed-income securities. Interest income is recognized as earned using the effective interest method, which adjusts the yield for security premiums and discounts, fees and other payments, so that a constant rate of return is recognized on the investment security s outstanding balance. Amounts are recognized until securities are in default or when it becomes likely that future interest payments will not be made as scheduled. Interest on deposits with banks and other is recognized as earned, and primarily relates to the placement of cash, in excess of near-term funding requirements, in interest-bearing time deposits, overnight sweep accounts, and other interest-bearing demand and call accounts. 7 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Interest Expense Interest expense includes interest incurred primarily to fund Card Member loans and receivables, general corporate purposes and liquidity needs, and is recognized as incurred. Interest expense is divided principally into two categories: (i) deposits, which primarily relates to interest expense on deposits taken from customers and institutions, and (ii) debt, which primarily relates to interest expense on our long-term debt and short-term borrowings, as well as the realized impact of derivatives used to hedge interest rate risk on our long-term debt. Marketing and Business Development As further described below under Recently Adopted Accounting Standards, effective January 1, 2018, in conjunction with the adoption of the new revenue recognition standard, the previously disclosed Marketing and Promotion line on the Consolidated Statements of Income was changed to Marketing and Business Development to reflect the inclusion of certain reclassified costs from Contra-discount revenue and Other expenses. Marketing and business development provides a more comprehensive view of costs related to building and growing our business, including the reclassified costs. Marketing and business development expense includes costs incurred in the development and initial placement of advertising, which are expensed in the year in which the advertising first takes place. Also included in Marketing and business development expense are Card Member statement credits for qualifying charges on eligible card accounts, corporate incentive payments earned on achievement of preset targets, and certain payments to GNS card issuing partners. These costs are generally expensed as incurred. Card Member Rewards We issue charge and credit cards that allow Card Members to participate in various rewards programs (e.g., Membership Rewards, cobrand and cash back). Rewards expense is recognized in the period Card Members earn rewards, generally by spending on their enrolled card products. We record a Card Member rewards liability that represents the estimated cost of points earned that are expected to be redeemed. Card Member rewards liabilities are impacted over time by enrollment levels, attrition, the volume of points earned and redeemed, and the associated redemption costs. Changes in the Card Member rewards liabilities during the period are taken as a charge or release to the Card Member rewards line. Effective January 1, 2018, in conjunction with the new revenue recognition standard, Card Member rewards also includes cash-back rewards, which were reclassified from contra discount revenue. Classification of various items Certain reclassifications of prior period amounts have been made to conform to the current period presentation, including the reclassification of certain business development expenses from Other expenses to Marketing and business development, that were not directly attributable to the adoption of the new revenue recognition guidance. Recently Issued Accounting Standards In February 2016, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued new accounting guidance on leases. The guidance, effective January 1, 2019, with early adoption permitted, requires virtually all leases to be recognized on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. We will adopt the standard effective January 1, 2019. The new guidance currently requires a modified retrospective transition approach, which would cause us to record existing operating leases on the Consolidated Balance Sheets upon adoption and in the comparative period. In January 2018, the FASB released an exposure draft that, if issued in its current form, would provide us with the option to adopt the provisions of the new guidance prospectively, without adjusting the comparative periods presented. We are in the process of upgrading our lease administration software and changing business processes and internal controls in preparation for the adoption. Specifically, we are currently reviewing our lease portfolio and are evaluating and interpreting the requirements under the guidance, including the available accounting policy elections, in order to determine the impacts on our financial position, results of operations, cash flows and regulatory risk-based capital, upon adoption . 8 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) In June 2016, the FASB issued new accounting guidance for recognition of credit losses on financial instruments, effective January 1, 2020, with early adoption permitted on January 1, 2019. The guidance introduces a new credit reserving model known as the Current Expected Credit Loss (CECL) model, which is based on expected losses, and differs significantly from the incurred loss approach used today. The CECL model requires measurement of expected credit losses not only based on historical experience and current conditions, but also by including reasonable and supportable forecasts incorporating forward-looking information. In addition, for available-for-sale debt securities, the new guidance replaces the other-than-temporary impairment model, and requires the recognition of an allowance for reductions in a security s fair value attributable to declines in credit quality, instead of a direct write-down of the security when a valuation decline is determined to be other-than-temporary. The guidance also requires a cumulative-effect adjustment to retained earnings as of the beginning of the reporting period of adoption. We do not intend to adopt the new standard early and are currently evaluating the impact the new guidance will have on our financial position, results of operations, cash flows and regulatory risk-based capital; however, it is expected that the CECL model will alter the assumptions used in estimating credit losses on Card Member loans and receivables, and may result in material increases to our credit reserves as the new guidance involves earlier recognition of expected losses for the life of the assets. We have established an enterprise-wide, cross-discipline governance structure to implement the new standard, and continue to identify and conclude on key interpretive issues along with evaluating our existing credit loss forecasting models and processes in relation to the new guidance to determine what modifications may be required. In February 2018, as a result of the enactment of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the Tax Act), the FASB issued new accounting guidance on the reclassification of certain tax effects from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) (AOCI) to retained earnings. The optional guidance is effective January 1, 2019, with early adoption permitted. We are evaluating whether we will adopt the new guidance along with any impacts on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows, none of which are expected to be material. Recently Adopted Accounting Standards Effective January 1, 2018, we adopted new revenue recognition guidance issued by the FASB related to contracts with customers. The scope of the new guidance excludes financial instruments such as credit and charge card arrangements. We elected to adopt the standard using the full retrospective method, which we believe is most useful to our investors. Under the full retrospective method, we are applying the standard back to January 1, 2016. As shown below, the most significant impacts of adoption are changes to the classification of certain revenues and expenses, including certain credit and charge card related costs previously netted against discount revenue, such as Card Member cash-back reward costs and statement credits, corporate incentive payments, as well as payments to third-party GNS card issuing partners. Under the new revenue standard, these costs are not considered components of the transaction price of our card acceptance agreements with merchants and thus are not netted against discount revenue, but instead are recognized as expenses. Our payments to third-party GNS card issuing partners are presented net of related revenues earned from the partners. The impact to the 2017 fiscal quarters and years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016 were as follows: In addition, the cumulative impact to our retained earnings on January 1, 2016 was an increase of $55.2 million. The adoption of the new guidance also resulted in changes to the recognition timing of certain revenues, the impact of which is not material to net income. Similarly, the adoption did not have a material impact on our Consolidated Balance Sheets or Statements of Cash Flows. We had no material contract assets, contract liabilities or deferred contract costs recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheet as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017. Contracts assets and liabilities are reported in a net position on a contract-by-contract basis at the end of each reporting period. In adopting the guidance, we implemented changes to our accounting policies, business processes, systems and internal controls to support the recognition, measurement and disclosure requirements under the new standard. Such changes were not material. 9 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) In January 2016, the FASB issued new accounting guidance on the recognition and measurement of financial assets and financial liabilities, which was effective and adopted by us as of January 1, 2018. The guidance makes targeted changes to GAAP; specifically to the classification and measurement of equity securities, and to certain disclosure requirements associated with the fair value of financial assets and liabilities. This applies to investments we make in non-public companies in the ordinary course of business, which historically were recognized under the cost method of accounting. These investments will be prospectively adjusted through earnings for observable price changes upon the identification of identical or similar transactions of the same company. The adoption of the guidance did not have a material impact on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows. We implemented changes to our accounting policies, business processes and internal controls in support of the new guidance. Such changes were not material. In August 2017, the FASB issued new accounting guidance providing targeted improvements to the accounting for hedging activities, effective January 1, 2019, with early adoption permitted in any interim period or fiscal year before the effective date. The guidance introduces a number of amendments, several of which are optional, that are designed to simplify the application of hedge accounting, improve financial statement transparency and more closely align hedge accounting with an entity s risk management strategies. Effective January 1, 2018, we adopted the guidance, with no material impact on our financial position, results of operations and cash flows, along with associated changes to our accounting policies, business processes and internal controls in support of the new guidance. Such changes were not material. 2. Business Events During the first quarter of 2018, we acquired from Citibank, N.A. its existing Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc. cobrand credit card loan portfolio (the acquired Hilton portfolio). The acquired Hilton portfolio had an outstanding principal and interest balance of approximately $1 billion at acquisition. None of the credit card loans acquired were considered purchased credit impaired at acquisition date. The cash outflows related to this acquisition are reported within the investing section of the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows as a net increase in Card Member receivables and loans. 10 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 3. Loans and Accounts Receivable Our lending and charge payment card products result in the generation of Card Member loans and Card Member receivables, respectively. Card Member loans by segment and Other loans as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017 consisted of: Card Member accounts receivable by segment and Other receivables as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017 consisted of: 11 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Card Member Loans and Card Member Receivables Aging Generally, a Card Member account is considered past due if payment is not received within 30 days after the billing statement date. The following table presents the aging of Card Member loans and receivables as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: 12 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Credit Quality Indicators for Card Member Loans and Receivables The following tables present the key credit quality indicators as of or for the six months ended June 30: 13 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Impaired Card Member Loans and Receivables Impaired Card Member loans and receivables are individual larger balance or homogeneous pools of smaller balance loans and receivables for which it is probable that we will be unable to collect all amounts due according to the original contractual terms of the Card Member agreement. In certain cases, these Card Member loans and receivables are included in one of our various Troubled Debt Restructuring (TDR) modification programs. Impaired Card Member loans and receivables outside the U.S. are not significant as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017; therefore, such loans and receivables are not included in the following tables unless otherwise noted. The following tables provide additional information with respect to our impaired Card Member loans and receivables as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: 14 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table provides information with respect to our average balances and interest income recognized from impaired Card Member loans and the average balances of impaired Card Member receivables: 15 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Card Member Loans and Receivables Modified as TDRs The following table provides additional information with respect to Card Member loans and receivables modified as TDRs for the three and six months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017. 16 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table provides information with respect to Card Member loans and receivables modified as TDRs that subsequently defaulted within 12 months of modification. A Card Member is considered in default of a modification program after one and up to two missed payments, depending on the terms of the modification program. For all Card Members that defaulted from a modification program, the probability of default is factored into the reserves for Card Member loans and receivables. 4. Reserves for Losses Reserves for losses relating to Card Member loans and receivables represent management s best estimate of the probable inherent losses in our outstanding portfolio of loans and receivables as of the balance sheet date. Management s evaluation process requires certain estimates and judgments. Changes in Card Member Loans Reserve for Losses The following table presents changes in the Card Member loans reserve for losses for the six months ended June 30: 17 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Card Member Loans Evaluated Individually and Collectively for Impairment The following table presents Card Member loans evaluated individually and collectively for impairment and related reserves as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: Changes in Card Member Receivables Reserve for Losses The following table presents changes in the Card Member receivables reserve for losses for the six months ended June 30: Card Member Receivables Evaluated Individually and Collectively for Impairment The following table presents Card Member receivables evaluated individually and collectively for impairment, and related reserves, as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: 18 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 5. Investment Securities Investment securities principally include available-for-sale debt securities carried at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, with unrealized gains and losses recorded in AOCI, net of income taxes. Realized gains and losses are recognized upon disposition of the securities using the specific identification method. Investment securities also include equity securities carried at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Effective January 1, 2018, the unrealized gains and losses on equity securities are recorded in the Consolidated Statements of Income; prior to January 1, 2018, the unrealized gains and losses on equity securities were recorded in AOCI, net of income taxes. The following is a summary of investment securities as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: The following table provides information about our available-for-sale debt securities with gross unrealized losses and the length of time that individual securities have been in an unrealized loss position as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: 19 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table summarizes the gross unrealized losses due to temporary impairments by ratio of fair value to amortized cost as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: The gross unrealized losses for available-for-sale debt securities are attributed to wider credit spreads for specific issuers, adverse changes in benchmark interest rates, or a combination thereof, all compared to those prevailing when the investment securities were purchased. Overall, for the available-for-sale debt securities in gross unrealized loss positions, (i) we do not intend to sell the securities, (ii) it is more likely than not that we will not be required to sell the securities before recovery of the unrealized losses, and (iii) we expect that the contractual principal and interest will be received on the securities. As a result, we recognized no other-than-temporary impairment during the periods presented. Contractual maturities for investment securities with stated maturities as of June 30, 2018 were as follows: The expected payments on state and municipal obligations and mortgage-backed securities may not coincide with their contractual maturities because the issuers have the right to call or prepay certain obligations. 20 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 6. Asset Securitizations We periodically securitize Card Member loans and receivables arising from our card businesses through the transfer of those assets to securitization trusts, American Express Credit Account Master Trust (the Lending Trust) and American Express Issuance Trust II (the Charge Trust and together with the Lending Trust, the Trusts). The Trusts then issue debt securities collateralized by the transferred assets to third-party investors. We perform the servicing and key decision making for the Trusts, and therefore have the power to direct the activities that most significantly impact the Trusts economic performance, which are the collection of the underlying Card Member loans and receivables. In addition, we hold all of the variable interests in both Trusts, with the exception of the debt securities issued to third-party investors. As of June 30, 2018, our ownership of variable interests was $7.7 billion and $5.2 billion for the Lending Trust and the Charge Trust, respectively. These variable interests held by us provide us with the right to receive benefits and the obligation to absorb losses, which could be significant to both the Lending Trust and the Charge Trust. Based on these considerations, we are the primary beneficiary of the Trusts and therefore consolidate the Trusts. The following table provides information on the restricted cash held by the Lending Trust and the Charge Trust as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017, included in Other assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets: These amounts relate to collections of Card Member loans and receivables to be used by the Trusts to fund future expenses and obligations, including interest on debt securities, credit losses and upcoming debt maturities. Under the respective terms of the Lending Trust and the Charge Trust agreements, the occurrence of certain triggering events associated with the performance of the assets of each Trust could result in payment of trust expenses, establishment of reserve funds, or, in a worst-case scenario, early amortization of debt securities. During the six months ended June 30, 2018 and the year ended December 31, 2017, no such triggering events occurred. 21 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 7. Customer Deposits As of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017, customer deposits were categorized as interest bearing or non-interest bearing as follows: Customer deposits by deposit type as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017 were as follows: The scheduled maturities of certificates of deposit as of June 30, 2018 were as follows: As of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017, certificates of deposit in denominations of $250,000 or more, in the aggregate, were as follows: 22 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 8. Contingencies In the ordinary course of business, we and our subsidiaries are subject to various pending and potential legal actions, arbitration proceedings, claims, investigations, examinations, information gathering requests, subpoenas, inquiries and matters relating to compliance with laws and regulations (collectively, legal proceedings). We disclose our material legal proceedings under Part II, Item 1. Legal Proceedings in this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q and Part I, Item 3. Legal Proceedings in the Annual Report. In addition to the matters disclosed under Legal Proceedings, we are being challenged in a number of countries regarding our application of value-added taxes (VAT) to certain of our international transactions, which are in various stages of audit, or are being contested in legal actions (collectively, VAT matters). While we believe we have complied with all applicable tax laws, rules and regulations in the relevant jurisdictions, the tax authorities may determine that we owe additional VAT. In certain jurisdictions where we are contesting the assessments, we were required to pay the VAT assessments prior to contesting. Our legal proceedings range from cases brought by a single plaintiff to class actions with millions of putative class members. These legal proceedings involve various lines of business and a variety of claims (including, but not limited to, common law tort, contract, application of tax laws, antitrust and consumer protection claims), some of which present novel factual allegations and/or unique legal theories. While some matters pending against us specify the damages claimed by the plaintiff or class, many seek an unspecified amount of damages or are at very early stages of the legal process. Even when the amount of damages claimed against us are stated, the claimed amount may be exaggerated and/or unsupported. As a result, some matters have not yet progressed sufficiently through discovery and/or development of important factual information and legal issues to enable us to estimate an amount of loss or a range of possible loss, while other matters have progressed sufficiently such that we are able to estimate an amount of loss or a range of possible loss. We have accrued for certain of our outstanding legal proceedings. An accrual is recorded when it is both (a) probable that a loss has occurred and (b) the amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. There may be instances in which an exposure to loss exceeds the accrual. We evaluate, on a quarterly basis, developments in legal proceedings that could cause an increase or decrease in the amount of the accrual that has been previously recorded, or a revision to the disclosed estimated range of possible losses, as applicable. For those disclosed material legal proceedings and VAT matters where a loss is reasonably possible in future periods, whether in excess of a recorded accrual for legal or tax contingencies, or where there is no such accrual, and for which we are able to estimate a range of possible loss, the current estimated range is zero to $390 million in excess of any accruals related to those matters. This range represents management s estimate based on currently available information and does not represent our maximum loss exposure; actual results may vary significantly. As such legal proceedings evolve, we may need to increase our range of possible loss or recorded accruals. Based on our current knowledge, and taking into consideration our litigation-related liabilities, we believe we are not a party to, nor are any of our properties the subject of, any legal proceeding that would have a material adverse effect on our consolidated financial condition or liquidity. However, in light of the uncertainties involved in such matters, it is possible that the outcome of legal proceedings, including the possible resolution of merchant claims, could have a material impact on our results of operations. 23 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 9. Derivatives and Hedging Activities We use derivative financial instruments (derivatives) to manage exposures to various market risks. These instruments derive their value from an underlying variable or multiple variables, including interest rates, foreign exchange rates, and equity index or price, and are carried at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. These instruments enable end users to increase, reduce or alter exposure to various market risks and, for that reason, are an integral component of our market risk management. We do not transact in derivatives for trading purposes. In relation to our credit risk, under the terms of the derivative agreements we have with our various counterparties, we are not required to either immediately settle any outstanding liability balances or post collateral upon the occurrence of a specified credit risk-related event. Based on our assessment of the credit risk of our derivative counterparties as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017, no credit risk adjustment to the derivative portfolio was required. The following table summarizes the total fair value, excluding interest accruals, of derivative assets and liabilities as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: A majority of our derivative assets and liabilities as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017 are subject to master netting agreements with our derivative counterparties. We have no derivative amounts subject to enforceable master netting arrangements that are not offset on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Fair Value Hedges We are exposed to interest rate risk associated with our fixed-rate long-term debt obligations. At the time of issuance, certain fixed-rate debt obligations are designated in fair value hedging relationships, using interest rate swaps, to economically convert the fixed interest rate to a floating interest rate. We have $23.7 billion and $23.8 billion of fixed-rate debt obligations designated in fair value hedging relationships as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017, respectively. The following table represents the gains and losses associated with the fair value hedges of our fixed-rate long-term debt: 24 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The carrying values of the hedged liabilities, recorded within Long-term debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, were $23.2 billion and $23.6 billion as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017, respectively, including offsetting amounts of $451 million and $182 million for the respective periods, related to the cumulative amount of fair value hedging adjustments. We recognized a net increase of $13 million and a net reduction of $37 million in interest expense on long-term debt for the three months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and net reductions of $1 million and $81 million for the six months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively, primarily related to the net settlements (interest accruals) on our interest rate derivatives designated as fair value hedges. Net Investment Hedges The gain or loss on net investment hedges, net of taxes, recorded in AOCI as part of the cumulative translation adjustment, was a gain of $320 million and a loss of $102 million for the three months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and a gain of $158 million and a loss of $331 million for the six months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Accumulated gains within AOCI of $1 million for the six months ended June 30, 2018 were reclassified into Other expenses upon investment sales or liquidations. Derivatives Not Designated as Hedges The changes in the fair value of derivatives that are not designated as hedges are intended to offset the related foreign exchange gains or losses of the underlying foreign currency exposures. The changes in the fair value of the derivatives and the related underlying foreign currency exposures resulted in a net gain of $55 million and a net loss of $4 million for the three months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and a net gain of $34 million and a net loss of $21 million for the six months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and are recognized in Other expenses. The changes in the fair value of an embedded derivative resulted in losses of $4 million and $3 million for the three months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and losses of $6 million and $2 million for the six months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and are recognized in Card Member services expense. 10. Fair Values Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Fair Value The following table summarizes our financial assets and financial liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis, categorized by GAAP s fair value hierarchy, as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: 25 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities Carried at Other Than Fair Value The following table summarizes the estimated fair values of our financial assets and financial liabilities that are measured at amortized cost, and not required to be carried at fair value on a recurring basis, as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017. The fair values of these financial instruments are estimates based upon the market conditions and perceived risks as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017, and require management s judgment. These figures may not be indicative of future fair values, nor can our fair value be estimated by aggregating the amounts presented. Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements We have certain assets that are subject to measurement at fair value on a nonrecurring basis. For these assets, measurement at fair value in periods subsequent to their initial recognition is applicable if they are determined to be impaired. During the six months ended June 30, 2018 and the year ended December 31, 2017, we did not have any material assets that were measured at fair value due to impairment. Equity investments previously held at cost that are adjusted through earnings for observable price changes are not material. 26 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 11. Guarantees As of June 30, 2018, the maximum potential undiscounted future payments and related liability resulting from guarantees and indemnifications provided by us in the ordinary course of business were $1 billion and $42 million, respectively, and related primarily to our real estate and business dispositions. As of December 31, 2017, the maximum potential undiscounted future payments and related liability were $1 billion and $52 million, respectively. To date we have not experienced any significant losses related to guarantees or indemnifications. Our recognition of these instruments is at fair value. In addition, we establish reserves when a loss is probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated. 12. Changes In Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income AOCI is comprised of items that have not been recognized in earnings but may be recognized in earnings in the future when certain events occur. Changes in each component for the three and six months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017 were as follows: 27 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) The following table shows the tax impact for the three and six months ended June 30 for the changes in each component of AOCI presented above: (a) Includes $289 million of tax benefits recognized in the six months ended June 30, 2017. The following table presents the effects of reclassifications out of AOCI and into the Consolidated Statements of Income: 28 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 13. Other Fees and Commissions, Other Revenues and Other Expenses The following is a detail of Other fees and commissions: The following is a detail of Other revenues: Revenue expected to be recognized in future periods related to contracts that have an original expected duration of one year or less and contracts with variable consideration (e.g. discount revenue) are not required to be disclosed. Non-interest revenue expected to be recognized in future periods through remaining contracts with customers is not material. The following is a detail of Other expenses: 29 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 14. Income Taxes The effective tax rate was 22.4 percent and 31.3 percent for the three months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively, and 22.0 percent and 31.6 percent for the six months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, respectively. The changes in tax rates for both periods primarily reflect the reduction in the U.S. federal statutory tax rate as a result of the Tax Act. The tax rates in the prior year also reflect the resolution of certain prior years tax items. In the fourth quarter of 2017, we recorded an estimated net discrete tax charge of $2.6 billion related to the Tax Act that was accounted for as a provisional charge under Staff Accounting Bulletin No.118. There were no material changes to these estimates for the current period. We continue to analyze the impacts of the Tax Act; therefore, the 2017 charge continues to be provisional. We are under continuous examination by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) and tax authorities in other countries and states in which we have significant business operations. The tax years under examination and open for examination vary by jurisdiction. We are currently under examination with the IRS for tax years 2008 through 2014. We believe it is reasonably possible that our unrecognized tax benefits could decrease within the next 12 months by as much as $319 million, principally as a result of potential resolutions of prior years tax items with various taxing authorities. The prior years tax items include unrecognized tax benefits relating to the deductibility of certain expenses or losses and the attribution of taxable income to a particular jurisdiction or jurisdictions. Of the $319 million of unrecognized tax benefits, approximately $286 million relates to amounts that, if recognized, would impact the effective tax rate in a future period. 15. Earnings Per Common Share (EPS) The computations of basic and diluted EPS were as follows: 30 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 16. Regulatory Matters and Capital Adequacy We are supervised and regulated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the Federal Reserve) and are subject to the Federal Reserve s requirements for risk-based capital and leverage ratios. Our U.S. bank subsidiary, American Express National Bank (AENB), is the surviving entity that resulted from the conversion of American Express Centurion Bank, a Utah state-chartered industrial bank, into a national banking association, and the subsequent merger of American Express Bank, FSB, a federal savings bank, into the successor entity as of April 1, 2018. AENB is subject to supervision and regulation, including regulatory capital and leverage requirements, by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (OCC). Under the risk-based capital guidelines of the Federal Reserve, we are required to maintain minimum ratios of Common Equity Tier 1 (CET1), Tier 1 and Total (Tier 1 plus Tier 2) capital to risk-weighted assets, as well as a minimum Tier 1 leverage ratio (Tier 1 capital to average adjusted on-balance sheet assets) and a supplementary leverage ratio (Tier 1 capital to both on-balance sheet and certain off-balance sheet exposures). Failure to meet minimum capital requirements can initiate certain mandatory, and possibly additional, discretionary actions by regulators, that, if undertaken, could have a direct material effect on our operating activities. As of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017, we met all capital requirements to which we were subject and maintained regulatory capital ratios in excess of those required to qualify as well capitalized. The following table presents the regulatory capital ratios: 31 Table of Contents AMERICAN EXPRESS COMPANY NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Unaudited) 17. Reportable Operating Segments We are a globally integrated payments company that is principally engaged in businesses comprising three reportable operating segments: GCSG, GCS and GMNS. Corporate functions and certain other businesses and operations are included in Corporate Other. Effective January 1, 2018, we changed the methodology used to allocate certain corporate overhead costs and interest income and expense to the operating segments. Effective April 1, 2018, we made additional changes to the methodology used to allocate certain corporate overhead costs to the operating segments. Prior period amounts have been revised to conform to the current period presentation. The following table presents certain selected financial information for our reportable operating segments and Corporate Other: 32 Table of Contents Business Introduction When we use the terms American Express, we, our or us, we mean American Express Company and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, unless we state or the context implies otherwise. We provide our customers with access to products, insights and experiences that enrich lives and build business success. Our principal products and services are charge and credit payment card products and travel-related services offered to consumers and businesses around the world. Our range of products and services includes: Charge card, credit card and other payment and financing products Merchant acquisition and processing, servicing and settlement, and point-of-sale marketing and information products and services for merchants Network services Other fee services, including fraud prevention services and the design and operation of customer loyalty programs Expense management products and services Travel-related services Stored-value/prepaid products Our various products and services are sold globally to diverse customer groups, including consumers, large corporations, mid-sized companies and small businesses. These products and services are sold through various channels, including mobile and online applications, direct mail, in-house sales teams, third-party vendors and direct response advertising. Business travel-related services are offered through our non-consolidated joint venture, American Express Global Business Travel (the GBT JV). We compete in the global payments industry with charge, credit and debit card networks, issuers and acquirers, paper-based transactions (e.g., cash and checks), bank transfer models (e.g., wire transfers and ACH), as well as evolving and growing alternative payment and financing providers. As the payments industry continues to evolve, we face increasing competition from non-traditional players that leverage new technologies and customer relationships to create payment or financing solutions. The following types of revenue are generated from our various products and services: Effective January 1, 2018, we adopted new revenue recognition guidance using the full retrospective method, which applies the new standard to each prior reporting period presented, starting January 1, 2016. The adoption changed the recognition timing and classification of certain revenues and expenses, including changes to the presentation of certain credit and charge card related costs that were previously netted against discount revenue. The adoption did not have a significant impact on our consolidated financial position, net income, equity or cash flows. Refer to Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information. In addition, we reclassified certain business development expenses, from other expenses to marketing and business development, which was not directly attributable to the adoption of the new revenue recognition guidance. 33 Table of Contents Effective for the second quarter of 2018, we realigned our reportable segments to reflect the organizational changes announced during the first quarter of 2018. Prior periods have been revised to conform to the new reportable operating segments, which are: Global Consumer Services Group (GCSG), Global Commercial Services (GCS) and Global Merchant and Network Services (GMNS), with corporate functions and certain other businesses and operations included in Corporate Other. Refer to Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information. Forward-Looking Statements and Non-GAAP Measures Certain of the statements in this Form 10-Q are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Refer to the Cautionary Note Regarding Forward-Looking Statements section. We prepare our Consolidated Financial Statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (GAAP). However, certain information included within this Form 10-Q constitutes non-GAAP financial measures. Our calculations of non-GAAP financial measures may differ from the calculations of similarly titled measures by other companies. Bank Holding Company American Express is a bank holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, and The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the Federal Reserve) is our primary federal regulator. As such, we are subject to the Federal Reserve s regulations, policies and minimum capital standards. Business Environment Our results for the second quarter reflect strong performance that continues the momentum from the beginning of the year, as we progress against our four strategic imperatives strengthening our leadership position with premium consumers, extending our strong position in the commercial payments space, strengthening our global, integrated network and making American Express an essential part of our customers digital lives. The increases in net income and earnings per share versus the prior year reflected growth across our businesses as well as a lower tax provision due to the reduction in the U.S. corporate income tax rate resulting from the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the Tax Act). Our worldwide billed business increased 10 percent over the prior year. Our U.S. and international proprietary consumer card issuing businesses saw continued double digit billings growth. The increase in U.S. billings versus the prior year reflected growth from existing customers and strong growth in our Platinum portfolios. The increase in commercial billings reflected growth across all of our commercial customer segments. Global Network Services billed business declined due to the impact of the evolving regulatory environment in the European Union and Australia; excluding the billings from those geographies Global Network Services billed business grew year-over-year. Revenues net of interest expense grew 9 percent, reflecting higher Card Member spending, fee income and net interest income, partially offset by a decline in the average discount rate. We continue to be focused on driving discount revenue growth, not on managing the average discount rate, which has led us to selectively adjust discount rates in order to drive higher volume growth and overall economics. While our net interest yield continued to increase year-over-year, the increase has moderated over the last few quarters as we grow over some of our prior-year pricing initiatives and experience higher funding costs. Card Member loans grew year-over-year, in line with the first quarter, as we continued to expand our lending relationships with existing customers and acquired new Card Members, including the acquisition from Citibank, N.A. of the portion of the Hilton cobrand portfolio that we did not previously own (the acquired Hilton portfolio). Provisions for losses increased as a result of higher Card Member loans and receivables and increases in net write-off rates. The increase in the lending net write-off rate was primarily due to the continued seasoning of recent loan vintages, and we expect this trend to continue. Spending on customer engagement (the aggregate of rewards, Card Member services and marketing and business development expenses) increased year-over-year across all categories. Growth in rewards and Card Member services reflected the growth in billings and continued higher levels of usage across many of our premium travel services. Marketing and business development expense increased due to higher spending on growth initiatives, including the launch of our new global brand campaign, continued investments in our cobrand partnerships and higher corporate client incentives. We expect spending on growth initiatives to remain at higher levels than the first quarter of 2018 for the balance of the year. Operating expense decreased modestly year-over-year, reflecting our continued focus on controlling operating costs. 34 Table of Contents As previously announced, we suspended our share buyback program for the first half of 2018 in order to rebuild our capital, and as a result, we saw our capital ratios sequentially improve during the second quarter. We continued to return capital to shareholders through our dividend distributions, and during the quarter, we received notice that the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the Federal Reserve) did not object to our capital plan. We will therefore be resuming our share buyback program during the third quarter of the year. While we continue to see some headwinds from a rising interest rate environment, regulation in countries around the world and intense competition, we remain focused on delivering differentiated value to our merchants, customers and business partners, while delivering appropriate returns to our shareholders. See Certain legislative, regulatory and other developments in Other Matters for information on certain matters that could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and financial condition. 35 Table of Contents American Express Company Consolidated Results of Operations Refer to the Glossary of Selected Terminology for the definitions of certain key terms and related information appearing within this section. The discussions in both the Consolidated Results of Operations and Business Segment Results provide commentary on the variances for the three and six months ended June 30, 2018 compared to same periods in the prior year, as presented in the accompanying tables. Effective January 1, 2018, we changed the methodology used to allocate certain corporate overhead costs and interest income and expense to the operating segments. Effective April 1, 2018, we made additional changes to the methodology used to allocate certain corporate overhead costs to the operating segments. Prior period amounts have been revised to conform to the current period presentation. Table 1: Summary of Financial Performance Table 2: Total Revenue Net of Interest Expense Summary Total Revenues Net of Interest Expense Discount revenue increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily due to growth in billed business of 10 percent and 11 percent for the three and six month periods, respectively, partially offset by a decrease in the average discount rate. U.S. billed business increased 10 percent for both periods. Non-U.S. billed business increased 10 percent and 13 percent for the three and six month periods, respectively. See Tables 5, 6 and 7 for more details on billed business performance. The decreases in the average discount rate for both the three and six month periods primarily reflected rate reductions from merchant negotiations, including those resulting from the recent regulatory changes affecting competitor pricing in certain international markets, changes in industry and geographic mix and the continued growth of the OptBlue program. We expect the average discount rate will continue to decline over time due to a greater shift of existing merchants into OptBlue, merchant negotiations and competition, volume related pricing discounts, certain pricing initiatives mainly driven by pricing regulation (including regulation of competitors interchange rates) and other factors. 36 Table of Contents Net card fees increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by growth in the Platinum and Delta portfolios, as well as growth in certain key international countries. Other fees and commissions increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by growth in foreign exchange conversion revenue, in addition to an increase in travel commissions and fees in the three month period and a change in the late fee assessment date for certain U.S. charge cards in the six month period. Other revenues decreased for both the three and six month periods. The decrease in both periods was primarily due to a reduction in revenues related to GNS partners and lower revenues related to our prepaid business, and additionally in the three month period by a decline in revenues related to the GBT JV. Interest income increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily reflecting higher average Card Member loans and higher yields. The growth in average Card Member loans was primarily driven by expanding relationships with existing customers, as well as the inclusion of the acquired Hilton portfolio. The increase in yields was primarily driven by a greater percentage of loans at higher rate buckets and specific pricing actions. Interest expense increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by higher interest rates, higher average long-term debt and higher average deposits. Table 3: Provisions for Losses Summary # Denotes a variance greater than 100 percent Provisions for Losses Charge card provision for losses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by growth in receivables due to increased billed business and higher net losses, largely in the corporate and small business portfolios. Card Member loans provision for losses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by continued strong loan growth and higher net write-offs as a result of the seasoning of recent loan vintages. Other provision for losses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily due to growth in the non-card lending portfolio. Table 4: Expenses Summary 37 Table of Contents Expenses Marketing and business development expense increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily due to higher spending on growth initiatives including the launch of our new global brand campaign, continued investments in partnerships, and increased corporate client incentives driven by higher volumes. Card Member rewards expense increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by increases in cobrand rewards expense of $152 million and $280 million and Membership Rewards and cash-back reward expenses of $83 million and $243 million, for the three and six month periods, respectively, all of which were primarily driven by higher spending volumes. The Membership Rewards Ultimate Redemption Rate (URR) for current program participants increased to 96 percent (rounded up) at June 30, 2018 from 95 percent (rounded down) at June 30, 2017. The increase in the URR reflects continued higher engagement in our Membership Rewards program. Card Member services expense increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by higher usage of travel-related benefits, in addition to enhanced Platinum card benefits in the six month period. Salaries and employee benefits expense was flat and increased for the three and six month periods, respectively, primarily driven by increases in incentive compensation, offset in the three month period by lower restructuring costs. Other expenses decreased and was flat for the three and six month periods, respectively. The decrease in the three month period was primarily driven by foreign currency-related gains and a value-added tax (VAT) reserve release, partially offset by a benefit in the prior year from a change in the liability related to non-delivery of goods and services by merchants. The six month period also reflected a loss on a transaction involving the operations of our prepaid reloadable and gift card business. Income Taxes The effective tax rate decreased for both the three and six month periods, primarily reflecting the reduction in the U.S. federal statutory tax rate as a result of the Tax Act. 38 Table of Contents Table 5: Selected Card-Related Statistical Information 39 Table of Contents Table 6: Billed Business Growth 40 Table of Contents Table 7: Billed Business Growth 41 Table of Contents Table 8: Selected Credit-Related Statistical Information # Denotes a variance greater than 100 percent 42 Table of Contents Table 9: Net Interest Yield on Average Card Member Loans 43 Table of Contents Business Segment Results Global Consumer Services Group Table 10: GCSG Selected Income Statement Data GCSG primarily issues a wide range of proprietary consumer cards globally. GCSG also provides services to consumers, including travel services and non-card financing products, and manages certain international joint ventures and our partnership agreements in China. Non-interest revenues increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by discount revenue, which increased $225 million, or 10 percent, and $470 million, or 11 percent, for the three and six month periods, respectively, reflecting increases in billed business of 13 percent and 14 percent, respectively, partially offset by declines in the average discount rate. U.S. billed business increased 10 percent and 11 percent for the three and six month periods, respectively. Non-U.S. billed business increased 20 percent and 22 percent for the three and six month periods, respectively. The increases in billed business reflected higher cards-in-force and higher average spend per card. Net card fees increased in both periods, driven primarily by growth in the Platinum and Delta portfolios, as well as growth across certain key international countries. Other fees and commissions increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by growth in foreign exchange conversion revenue, in addition to an increase in travel commissions in the three month period and a change in the late fee assessment date for certain charge cards in the six month period. Net interest income increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by growth in average Card Member loans and higher yields, partially offset by higher interest expense, primarily driven by higher cost of funds. The growth in average Card Member loans was primarily driven by expanding relationships with existing customers, as well as the inclusion of the acquired Hilton portfolio. The increase in yields was primarily driven by a greater percentage of loans at higher rate buckets and specific pricing actions. Provisions for losses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by Card Member loan provisions due to strong lending growth and higher write-offs as a result of the continued seasoning of recent loan vintages. 44 Table of Contents Marketing, business development, rewards and Card Member services expenses increased for both the three and six month periods across all expense categories. Card Member rewards expense increased $176 million and $391 million for the three and six month periods, respectively, driven by increased spending volumes. The increase in marketing and business development expenses was primarily due to higher spending on growth initiatives and higher cobrand partner payments as a result of recent cobrand agreements. The increase in Card Member services expenses was primarily driven in both periods by higher usage of travel-related benefits and, in the six month period, by the enhanced Platinum card benefits. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by increases in payroll costs, partially offset, in the six month period, by gains on the re-measurement of certain equity investments previously carried at cost. The effective tax rate was lower for both the three and six month periods, primarily reflecting the reduction in the U.S. federal statutory tax rate as a result of the Tax Act. 45 Table of Contents Table 11: GCSG Selected Statistical Information 46 Table of Contents 47 Table of Contents Table 12: GCSG Net Interest Yield on Average Card Member Loans 48 Table of Contents Global Commercial Services Table 13: GCS Selected Income Statement Data GCS primarily issues a wide range of proprietary corporate and small business cards and provides payment and expense management services globally. In addition, GCS provides commercial financing products. Non-interest revenues increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by higher discount revenue due to increases in billed business, partially offset by declines in the average discount rate. The increase in non-interest revenues in both periods was also driven by higher net card fees and higher other fees and commissions, primarily due to growth in the U.S. small business Platinum portfolio and higher delinquency fees, respectively. Net interest income was flat and increased for the three and six month periods, respectively, primarily driven by an increase in average Card Member loans and higher yields, offset, in part for the six month period, by higher interest expense, reflecting an increase in the cost of funds. Provisions for losses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily due to growth in both Card Member receivables and loans, higher charge net losses across both corporate and small business portfolios and higher lending net write-off rates in the small business portfolio. Marketing, business development, rewards and Card Member services expenses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by increases in Card Member rewards expenses and marketing and business development expenses, both of which were due to higher spending volumes, as well as an increase in spending on growth initiatives. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by increases in incentive compensation and higher technology and other servicing-related costs, partially offset by prior period hedge ineffectiveness now included in interest expense. The effective tax rate was lower for both the three and six months, primarily reflecting the reduction in the U.S. federal statutory tax rate as a result of the Tax Act. 49 Table of Contents Table 14: GCS Selected Statistical Information 50 Table of Contents Global Merchant and Network Services Table 15: GMNS Selected Income Statement and Other Data # Denotes a variance greater than 100 percent GNMS operates a global payments network that processes and settles card transactions, acquires merchants and provides multi-channel marketing programs and capabilities, services and data analytics, leveraging our global integrated network. GMNS enters into partnership agreements with third-party card issuers and acquirers, licensing the American Express brand and extending the reach of the global network. GMNS also manages loyalty coalition businesses in certain countries around the world and our reloadable prepaid and gift card businesses. Non-interest revenues were flat and increased for the three and six month periods, respectively, primarily driven by billed business growth, which was offset by a decline in the average discount rate in both periods and, in the three month period, by lower revenues from network partners. Net interest income increased for both the three and six month periods, reflecting a higher interest expense credit relating to internal transfer pricing, which results in a net benefit for GMNS due to its merchant payables. Marketing, business development, rewards and Card Member services expenses decreased for both the three and six month periods, reflecting lower levels of network partnership payments in certain countries. Salaries and employee benefits and other operating expenses increased for both the three and six month periods, primarily driven by a prior year benefit from a change in the liability related to non-delivery of goods and services by merchants. The effective tax rate decreased for both the three and six month periods, primarily reflecting the reduction in the U.S. federal statutory tax rate as a result of the Tax Act. 51 Table of Contents Corporate Other Corporate functions and certain other businesses are included in Corporate Other. Corporate Other net expense was $254 million for the three months ended June 30, 2018, compared to $224 million in the same period a year ago and $508 million for the six month period compared to $484 million in the same period a year ago. The increase in net expense for the six month period was driven in part by a loss on a transaction involving the operations of our prepaid reloadable and gift card business. CONSOLIDATED CAPITAL RESOURCES AND LIQUIDITY Our balance sheet management objectives are to maintain: Basel III The following table presents our regulatory risk-based capital ratios and leverage ratios as of June 30, 2018. Effective April 1, 2018, our bank subsidiaries, American Express Centurion Bank and American Express Bank, FSB, were merged to become American Express National Bank (AENB). Refer to Note 16 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information. Table 16: Regulatory Risk-Based Capital and Leverage Ratios 52 Table of Contents Table 17: Regulatory Risk-Based Capital Components and Risk Weighted Assets We seek to maintain capital levels and ratios in excess of the minimum regulatory requirements and finance such capital in a cost efficient manner; failure to maintain minimum capital levels could affect our status as a financial holding company and cause regulatory agencies to take actions that could limit our business operations. Our primary source of equity capital has been the generation of net income. Capital generated through net income and other sources, such as the exercise of stock options by employees, is used to maintain a strong balance sheet, support asset growth and engage in acquisitions, with excess available for distribution to shareholders through dividends and share repurchases. We currently expect that the portion of generated capital we allocate to support asset growth will be greater going forward than it has been historically due to projected asset growth. We maintain certain flexibility to shift capital across our businesses as appropriate. For example, we may infuse additional capital into subsidiaries to maintain capital at targeted levels in consideration of debt ratings and regulatory requirements. These infused amounts can affect the capital profile and liquidity levels at the American Express parent company level. The following are definitions for our regulatory risk-based capital ratios and leverage ratio, which are calculated as per standard regulatory guidance: Risk-Weighted Assets Assets are weighted for risk according to a formula used by the Federal Reserve to conform to capital adequacy guidelines. On- and off-balance sheet items are weighted for risk, with off-balance sheet items converted to balance sheet equivalents, using risk conversion factors, before being allocated a risk-adjusted weight. Off-balance sheet exposures comprise a minimal part of the total risk-weighted assets. Common Equity Tier 1 Risk-Based Capital Ratio Calculated as Common Equity Tier 1 capital (CET1), divided by risk-weighted assets. CET1 is the sum of common shareholders equity, adjusted for ineligible goodwill and intangible assets, certain deferred tax assets, as well as certain other comprehensive income items as follows: net unrealized gains/losses on securities and derivatives, and net unrealized pension and other postretirement benefit/losses, all net of tax. Tier 1 Risk-Based Capital Ratio Calculated as Tier 1 capital divided by risk-weighted assets. Tier 1 capital is the sum of CET1, our perpetual preferred stock and third-party non-controlling interests in consolidated subsidiaries adjusted for capital held by insurance subsidiaries and deferred tax assets from net operating losses not deducted from CET1. The minimum requirement for the Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio is 1.5 percent higher than the minimum for the CET1 risk-based capital ratio. We have $1.6 billion of preferred shares outstanding to help address a portion of the Tier 1 capital requirements in excess of common equity requirements. Total Risk-Based Capital Ratio Calculated as the sum of Tier 1 capital and Tier 2 capital, divided by risk-weighted assets. Tier 2 capital is the sum of the allowance for loan and receivable losses (limited to 1.25 percent of risk-weighted assets), a portion of the unrealized gains on equity securities and $600 million of subordinated notes, adjusted for capital held by insurance subsidiaries. Tier 1 Leverage Ratio Calculated by dividing Tier 1 capital by our average total consolidated assets for the most recent quarter. 53 Table of Contents Supplementary Leverage Ratio Calculated by dividing Tier 1 capital by total leverage exposure under Basel III. Leverage exposure, which reflects average total consolidated assets with adjustments for Tier 1 capital deductions, average off-balance sheet derivatives exposures, securities purchased under agreements to resell and credit equivalents of undrawn commitments that are both conditionally and unconditionally cancellable. Share Repurchases and Dividends We return capital to common shareholders through dividends and share repurchases. The share repurchases reduce common shares outstanding and more than offset the issuance of new shares as part of employee compensation plans. We decided to suspend our share buyback program for the first half of 2018 in order to rebuild our capital levels and ratios. During the three and six months ended June 30, 2018, we returned $0.3 billion and $0.6 billion, respectively, to our shareholders in the form of common stock dividends. These dividends represent approximately 18 percent of total capital generated during both the three and six-month periods. In addition, during the three months ended June 30, 2018, we had $750 million of non-cumulative perpetual preferred shares (the Series B Preferred Shares) and $850 million of non-cumulative perpetual preferred shares (the Series C Preferred Shares) outstanding. Dividends declared and paid on Series B Preferred Shares during the second quarter of 2018 were $20 million. On June 28, 2018, we were informed that the Federal Reserve did not object to our capital plan to return capital to shareholders through share repurchases of up to $3.4 billion during the period beginning with the third quarter of 2018 through and including the second quarter of 2019, as well as an increase in our quarterly dividend to $0.39 per share, from $0.35 per share, beginning with the third quarter 2018 dividend declaration, subject to approval by our Board of Directors. The timing and amount of common shares purchased under our authorized capital plan will depend on various factors, including our business plans, financial performance and market conditions. To facilitate repurchases, we may, from time to time, make purchases pursuant to one or more trading plans under Rule 10b5-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, which allows us to repurchase common shares during periods when we might otherwise be prevented from doing so under applicable law or because of self-imposed trading blackout periods. Funding Strategy Our principal funding objective is to maintain broad and well-diversified funding sources to allow us to meet our maturing obligations, cost-effectively finance current and future asset growth in our global businesses as well as to maintain a strong liquidity profile. We meet our funding needs through a variety of sources, including direct and third-party distributed deposits and debt instruments, such as senior unsecured debentures, asset securitizations, borrowings through secured borrowing facilities and a long-term committed bank borrowing facility. While we diversify our funding sources by maintaining scale and relevance in unsecured debentures, asset securitizations and deposits, we currently expect that the Personal Savings High Yield Savings Account direct retail deposit program will become a larger proportion over time. Summary of Consolidated Debt We had the following consolidated debt and customer deposits outstanding as of June 30, 2018 and December 31, 2017: Table 18: Summary of Consolidated Debt and Customer Deposits 54 Table of Contents We may redeem from time to time certain debt securities within 31 days prior to the original contractual maturity dates in accordance with the optional redemption provisions of those debt securities. During the three months ended June 30, 2018, we issued (i) $1.5 billion of asset-backed securities from the American Express Credit Account Master Trust (the Lending Trust) consisting of $900 million of three year Class A Certificates at a fixed rate of 2.99 percent and $600 million of five year Class A Certificates at a floating rate of 1-month LIBOR plus 34 basis points, and (ii) $2.0 billion of senior unsecured notes from American Express Company consisting of $1.2 billion of three year notes at a fixed rate of 3.375 percent and $800 million of three year notes at a floating rate of 3-month LIBOR plus 52.5 basis points. On July 23, 2018, we issued $1.7 billion of asset-backed securities from the Lending Trust consisting of $1.2 billion of three year Class A Certificates at a fixed rate of 3.06 percent and $525 million of five year Class A Certificates at a floating rate of 1-month LIBOR plus 36 basis points. Our equity capital and funding strategies are designed, among other things, to maintain appropriate and stable unsecured debt ratings from the major credit rating agencies: Moody s Investor Services (Moody s), Standard Poor s (S P), Fitch Ratings (Fitch) and Dominion Bond Rating Services (DBRS). Such ratings help support our access to cost-effective unsecured funding as part of our overall funding strategy. Our asset securitization activities are rated separately. Table 19: Unsecured Debt Ratings Downgrades in the ratings of our unsecured debt or asset securitization program securities could result in higher funding costs, as well as higher fees related to borrowings under our unused lines of credit. Declines in credit ratings could also reduce our borrowing capacity in the unsecured debt and asset securitization capital markets. We believe our funding mix, including the proportion of U.S. retail deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, should reduce the impact that credit rating downgrades would have on our funding capacity and costs. Liquidity Management We incur liquidity risk that arises in the course of offering our products and services. Our liquidity objective is to maintain access to a diverse set of on- and off-balance sheet liquidity sources. We seek to maintain liquidity sources in amounts sufficient to meet our expected future financial obligations and business requirements for liquidity for a period of at least twelve months in the event we are unable to raise new funds under our regular funding programs during a substantial weakening in economic conditions. Our liquidity risk policy sets out our objectives and approach to managing liquidity risk. The liquidity risks that we are exposed to could arise from a wide variety of scenarios. Our liquidity management strategy thus includes a number of elements, including, but not limited to: The amount and type of liquidity resources we maintain can vary over time, based upon the results of stress scenarios required under the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and other various regulatory liquidity requirements, such as the Liquidity Coverage Ratio, as well as additional stress scenarios required under our liquidity risk policy. 55 Table of Contents The investment income we receive on liquidity resources, such as cash, is less than the interest expense on the sources of funding for these balances. The net interest costs to maintain these resources have been substantial. The level of future net interest costs depends on the amount of liquidity resources we maintain and the difference between our cost of funding these amounts and their investment yields. Securitized Borrowing Capacity As of June 30, 2018, we maintained our committed, revolving, secured borrowing facility, with a maturity date of July 15, 2020, which gives us the right to sell up to $3.0 billion face amount of eligible AAA notes from the American Express Issuance Trust II (the Charge Trust). We also maintained our committed, revolving, secured borrowing facility, with a maturity date of September 15, 2020, which gives us the right to sell up to $2.0 billion face amount of eligible AAA certificates from the Lending Trust. Both facilities are used in the ordinary course of business to fund seasonal working capital needs, as well as to further enhance our contingent funding resources. As of June 30, 2018, $2.0 billion was drawn on the Charge Trust facility, and no amounts were drawn on the Lending Trust facility. Federal Reserve Discount Window As an insured depository institution, AENB may borrow from the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco, subject to the amount of qualifying collateral that they may pledge. The Federal Reserve has indicated that both credit and charge card receivables are a form of qualifying collateral for secured borrowings made through the discount window. Whether specific assets will be considered qualifying collateral and the amount that may be borrowed against the collateral, remain at the discretion of the Federal Reserve. We had approximately $73.5 billion as of June 30, 2018 in U.S. credit card loans and charge card receivables that could be sold over time through our securitization trusts or pledged in return for secured borrowings to provide further liquidity, subject in each case to applicable market conditions and eligibility criteria. Committed Bank Credit Facility In addition to the secured borrowing facilities described earlier in this section, we maintained a committed syndicated bank credit facility as of June 30, 2018 of $3.5 billion, which expires on October 16, 2020. As of June 30, 2018, no amounts were drawn on this facility. Unused Credit Outstanding As of June 30, 2018, we had approximately $293 billion of unused credit outstanding as part of established lending product agreements. Total unused credit does not represent potential future cash requirements, as a significant portion of this unused credit will likely not be drawn. Our charge card products generally have no pre-set limit, and therefore are not reflected in unused credit available to Card Members. Cash Flows The following table summarizes our cash flow activity for the six months ended June 30: Table 20: Cash Flows 56 Table of Contents Cash Flows from Operating Activities Our cash flows from operating activities primarily include net income adjusted for (i) non-cash items included in net income and (ii) changes in the balances of operating assets and liabilities, which can vary significantly in the normal course of business due to the amount and timing of payments. The increase in net cash provided by operating activities was driven by net income adjusted for non-cash items, including changes in provisions for losses, depreciation and amortization, deferred taxes and stock-based compensation, and changes in operating assets and liabilities, primarily accounts payable and other liabilities as a result of normal business operations. Cash Flows from Investing Activities Our cash flows from investing activities primarily include changes in Card Member loans and receivables, as well as changes in our available-for-sale investment securities portfolio. The increase in net cash used in investing activities was driven by higher growth in Card Member loans due in part to the acquired Hilton portfolio and a larger net increase in the investment securities portfolio. Cash Flows from Financing Activities Our cash flows from financing activities primarily include changes in long-term debt, short-term borrowings and customer deposits as well as our regular common share dividend and share repurchase programs. The decrease in net cash provided by financing activities was primarily driven by a net decrease in long-term debt and lower increase in customer deposits, partially offset by a decrease in share repurchases. 57 Table of Contents OTHER MATTERS Certain Legislative, Regulatory and Other Developments We are subject to comprehensive government regulation and supervision in jurisdictions around the world, and the costs of compliance are substantial. In recent years, the financial services industry has been subject to rigorous scrutiny, high regulatory expectations, and a stringent and unpredictable regulatory enforcement environment. Please see the Supervision and Regulation and Risk Factors sections of the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017 (the 2017 Form 10-K) for further information. Payments Regulation Legislators and regulators in various countries in which we operate have focused on the operation of card networks, including through antitrust actions, legislation and regulations to change certain practices or pricing of card issuers, merchant acquirers and payment networks, and, in some cases, to establish broad and ongoing regulatory oversight regimes for payment systems. The European Union, Australia and other jurisdictions have focused on the fees merchants pay to accept cards, including the way bankcard network members collectively set the interchange (that is, the fee paid by the bankcard merchant acquirer to the card issuer in four party networks like Visa and MasterCard), as well as the rules, contract terms and practices governing merchant card acceptance. Even where we are not directly regulated, regulation of bankcard fees can significantly negatively impact the discount revenue derived from our business, including as a result of downward pressure on our discount rate from decreases in competitor pricing in connection with caps on interchange fees. In some cases, such regulation extends to certain aspects of our business. For more information on the European Union and Australian payments regulation, as well as the potential impacts on our results of operations and business, please see the Supervision and Regulation and Risk Factors sections of the 2017 Form 10-K. Broad regulatory oversight over payment systems can also include, in some cases, requirements for international card networks to localize aspects of their operations, such as processing infrastructure, which could increase our costs and diminish the value of our closed loop. The development and enforcement of payment system regulatory regimes generally continue to grow and may adversely affect our ability to compete effectively and maintain and extend our global network. Surcharging In certain countries, such as certain Member States in the European Union and Australia, merchants are permitted by law to surcharge card purchases. While surcharging continues to be actively considered in certain jurisdictions, the benefits to customers have not been apparent in countries that have allowed it, and in some cases regulators are addressing concerns about excessive surcharging by merchants. For example, the Reserve Bank of Australia amended its rules to limit surcharging in Australia to the actual cost of card acceptance paid to the merchant acquirer. Surcharging, particularly where it disproportionately impacts American Express Card Members, which is known as differential surcharging, as well as other steering practices that are permitted by regulation in some countries, could have a material adverse effect on us if it becomes widespread. As revisions to the Payment Services Directive in the European Union are transposed into national law by each Member State, there may be increased instances of differential surcharging of our cards, customer and merchant confusion as to which transactions may be surcharged and Card Member dissatisfaction. In addition, the laws of a number of states in the United States that prohibit surcharging are being challenged in litigation brought by merchant groups. For more information on the potential impacts of surcharging and other actions that could impair the Card Member experience, please see the Risk Factors section of the 2017 Form 10-K. 58 Table of Contents Consumer Financial Products Regulation In the United States, our marketing, sale and servicing of consumer financial products and our compliance with certain federal consumer financial laws are supervised and examined by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB), which has broad rulemaking and enforcement authority over providers of credit, savings and payment services and products and authority to prevent unfair, deceptive or abusive acts or practices. In addition, a number of U.S. states have significant consumer credit protection, disclosure and other laws (in certain cases more stringent than U.S. federal laws). U.S. federal law also regulates abusive debt collection practices, which along with bankruptcy and debtor relief laws, can affect our ability to collect amounts owed to us or subject us to regulatory scrutiny. Internal and regulatory reviews to assess compliance with such laws and regulations have resulted in, and are likely to continue to result in, changes to our practices, products and procedures, substantial restitution to our Card Members and increased costs related to regulatory oversight, supervision and examination. Such reviews may also result in additional regulatory actions, including civil money penalties. These types of reviews will be a continuing focus for the CFPB and regulators more broadly, as well as for the Company itself. For more information on consumer financial products regulation, as well as the potential impacts on our results of operations and business, please see the Supervision and Regulation and Risk Factors sections of the 2017 Form 10-K. Antitrust Litigation The U.S. Department of Justice and certain states attorneys general brought an action against us in 2010 alleging that the provisions in our card acceptance agreements with merchants that prohibit merchants from engaging in various actions to discriminate against our card products violate the U.S. antitrust laws. On June 25, 2018, the Supreme Court found in favor of American Express in that case. We continue to vigorously defend similar antitrust claims initiated by merchants in court and arbitration proceedings. See Part II, Item 1. Legal Proceedings below and the Legal Proceedings section in our 2017 Form 10-K for descriptions of the cases. It is possible that actions impairing the Card Member experience, or the resolution of one or any combination of these merchant claims for damages, could have a material adverse effect on our business. For more information on the potential impacts of an adverse decision in the merchant litigations on our business, please see the Risk Factors section of the 2017 Form 10-K. Privacy, Data Protection, Information and Cyber Security Regulatory and legislative activity in the areas of privacy, data protection and information and cyber security continues to increase worldwide. We have established and continue to maintain policies that provide a framework for compliance with applicable laws, meet evolving customer expectations and support and enable business innovation and growth. Global financial institutions like us have experienced a significant increase in information and cyber security risk in recent years and will likely continue to be the target of increasingly sophisticated cyber attacks, including computer viruses, malicious or destructive code, ransomware, social engineering attacks (including phishing and impersonation), hacking, denial-of-service attacks and other attacks and similar disruptions from the unauthorized use of or access to computer systems. For more information on privacy, data protection and information and cyber security regulation and the potential impacts of a major information or cyber security incident on our results of operations and business, please see the Supervision and Regulation and Risk Factors sections of the 2017 Form 10-K. 59 Table of Contents Recently Issued Accounting Standards Refer to the Recently Issued Accounting Standards section of Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements. Glossary of Selected Terminology Adjusted net interest income A non-GAAP measure that represents net interest income attributable to our Card Member loans (which includes, on a GAAP basis, interest that is deemed uncollectible), excluding the impact of interest expense and interest income not attributable to our Card Member loans. We believe adjusted net interest income is useful to investors because it represents the interest expense and interest income attributable to our Card Member loan portfolio and it is a component of net interest yield on average Card Member loans. Asset securitizations Asset securitization involves the transfer and sale of loans or receivables to a special-purpose entity created for the securitization activity, typically a trust. The trust, in turn, issues securities, commonly referred to as asset-backed securities that are secured by the transferred loans and receivables. The trust uses the proceeds from the sale of such securities to pay the purchase price for the underlying loans or receivables. The loans and receivables of our Lending Trust and Charge Trust (collectively, the Trusts) securitized are reported as assets and the securities issued by the Trusts are reported as liabilities on our Consolidated Balance Sheets. Average discount rate This calculation is generally designed to reflect the average pricing at all merchants accepting American Express cards and represents the percentage of proprietary and GNS billed business retained by us from merchants we acquire, or from merchants acquired by third parties on our behalf, net of amounts retained by such third parties. Billed business Represents transaction volumes (including cash advances) on cards and other payment products issued by American Express (proprietary card billed business) and cards issued under network partnership agreements with banks and other institutions, including joint ventures (GNS card billed business). In-store spending activity within GNS retail cobrand portfolios, from which we earn no revenue, is not included in billed business. Billed business is reported in the United States or outside the United States based on the location of the issuer. Capital ratios Represents the minimum standards established by the regulatory agencies as a measure to determine whether the regulated entity has sufficient capital to absorb on- and off-balance sheet losses beyond current loss accrual estimates. Refer to the Capital Strategy section under Consolidated Capital Resources and Liquidity for further related definitions under Basel III. Cards-in-force Represents the number of cards that are issued and outstanding by American Express (proprietary cards-in-force) and cards issued and outstanding under network partnership agreements with banks and other institutions, including joint ventures (GNS cards-in-force), except for GNS retail cobrand cards that have no out of store spend activity during the prior 12 months. Basic cards-in-force excludes supplemental cards issued on consumer accounts. Card Member The individual holder of an issued American Express-branded charge, credit and certain prepaid cards. Card Member loans Represents the outstanding amount due from Card Members for charges made on their American Express credit cards, as well as any interest charges and card-related fees. Card Member loans also include revolving balances on certain American Express charge card products. Card Member receivables Represents the outstanding amount due from Card Members for charges made on their American Express charge cards, as well as any card-related fees, other than revolving balances on certain American Express charge cards with Pay Over Time features. Such revolving balances are included within Card Member loans. Charge cards Represents cards that generally carry no pre-set spending limits and are primarily designed as a method of payment and not as a means of financing purchases. Charge Card Members generally must pay the full amount billed each month. No finance charges are assessed on charge cards. Each charge card transaction is authorized based on its likely economics reflecting a Card Member s most recent credit information and spend patterns. Some charge card accounts have additional Pay Over Time feature(s) that allow revolving of certain charges. Cobrand cards Cards issued under cobrand agreements with selected commercial firms. Pursuant to the cobrand agreements, we make payments to our cobrand partners, which can be significant, based primarily on the amount of Card Member spending and corresponding rewards earned on such spending and, under certain arrangements, on the number of accounts acquired and retained. In some cases, the partner is liable for providing rewards to the Card Member under the cobrand partner s own loyalty program. 60 Table of Contents Credit cards Represents cards that have a range of revolving payment terms, grace periods, and rate and fee structures. Discount revenue Represents revenue earned from fees generally charged to merchants who have entered into a card acceptance agreement. The discount fee generally is deducted from our payment for Card Member purchases. Interest expense Includes interest incurred primarily to fund Card Member loans and receivables, general corporate purposes and liquidity needs, and is recognized as incurred. Interest expense is divided principally into two categories: (i) deposits, which primarily relates to interest expense on deposits taken from customers and institutions, and (ii) debt, which primarily relates to interest expense on our long-term financing and short-term borrowings, (e.g., commercial paper, federal funds purchased, bank overdrafts and other short-term borrowings), as well as the realized impact of derivatives hedging interest rate risk on our long-term debt. Interest income Includes (i) interest on loans, (ii) interest and dividends on investment securities and (iii) interest income on deposits with banks and other. Interest on loans Assessed using the average daily balance method for Card Member loans. Unless the loan is classified as non-accrual, interest is recognized based upon the principal amount outstanding in accordance with the terms of the applicable account agreement until the outstanding balance is paid or written off. Interest and dividends on investment securities Primarily relates to our performing fixed-income securities. Interest income is recognized as earned using the effective interest method, which adjusts the yield for security premiums and discounts, fees and other payments, so a constant rate of return is recognized on the outstanding balance of the related investment security throughout its term. Amounts are recognized until securities are in default or when it is likely that future interest payments will not be made as scheduled. Interest income on deposits with banks and other Recognized as earned, and primarily relates to the placement of cash in excess of near-term funding requirements in interest-bearing time deposits, overnight sweep accounts, and other interest-bearing demand and call accounts. Liquidity Coverage Ratio Represents the minimum standards established by regulatory agencies as a measure to determine whether the regulated entity has sufficient liquidity to meet liquidity needs in periods of financial and economic stress. Merchant acquisition Represents our process of entering into agreements with merchants to accept American Express-branded cards. Net card fees Represents the card membership fees earned during the period. These fees are recognized as revenue over the covered card membership period (typically one year), net of the provision for projected refunds for Card Membership cancellation and deferred acquisition costs. Net interest yield on average Card Member loans A non-GAAP measure that is computed by dividing adjusted net interest income by average Card Member loans, computed on an annualized basis. Reserves and net write-offs related to uncollectible interest are recorded through provisions for losses, and are thus not included in the net interest yield calculation. We believe net interest yield on average Card Member loans is useful to investors because it provides a measure of profitability of our Card Member loan portfolio. Net loss ratio Represents the ratio of GCP charge card write-offs, consisting of principal (resulting from authorized transactions) and fee components, less recoveries, on Card Member receivables expressed as a percentage of gross amounts billed to corporate Card Members. Net write-off rate principal only Represents the amount of proprietary consumer or small business Card Member loans or receivables written off, consisting of principal (resulting from authorized transactions), less recoveries, as a percentage of the average loan or receivables balance during the period. Net write-off rate principal, interest and fees Includes, in the calculation of the net write-off rate, amounts for interest and fees in addition to principal for Card Member loans and fees in addition to principal for Card Member receivables. Operating expenses Represents salaries and employee benefits, professional services, occupancy and equipment, and other expenses. Return on average equity Calculated by dividing one-year period net income by one-year average total shareholders equity. 61 Table of Contents °Item 3. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK Market risk is the risk to earnings or asset and liability values resulting from movements in market prices. Our market risk exposures include (i) interest rate risk due to changes in the relationship between the interest rates on our assets (such as loans, receivables and investment securities) and the interest rates on our liabilities (such as debt and deposits); and (ii) foreign exchange risk related to transactions, funding, investments and earnings in currencies other than the U.S. dollar. There were no material changes in these market risks since December 31, 2017. °Item 4. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES Our management, with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, has evaluated the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act)) as of the end of the period covered by this report. Based on such evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have concluded that, as of the end of such period, our disclosure controls and procedures are effective and designed to ensure that the information required to be disclosed in our reports filed or submitted under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the requisite time periods specified in the applicable rules and forms, and that it is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. There have not been any changes in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act) during the fiscal quarter to which this report relates that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting. Cautionary Note Regarding Forward-looking Statements This report includes forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, which are subject to risks and uncertainties. The forward-looking statements, which address our expected business and financial performance, among other matters, contain words such as believe, expect, estimate, anticipate, intend, plan, aim, will, may, should, could, would, likely, and similar expressions. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date on which they are made. We undertake no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements, include, but are not limited to, the following: 62 Table of Contents 63 Table of Contents A further description of these uncertainties and other risks can be found in the 2017 Form 10-K and our other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. 64 Table of Contents PART II. OTHER INFORMATION °Item 1. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS In the ordinary course of business, we are subject to various pending and potential legal actions, arbitration proceedings, claims, investigations, examinations, information gathering requests, subpoenas, inquiries and matters relating to compliance with laws and regulations (collectively, legal proceedings). We do not believe we are a party to, nor are any of our properties the subject of, any legal proceeding that would have a material adverse effect on our consolidated financial condition or liquidity. However, in light of the uncertainties involved in such matters, including the fact that some pending legal proceedings are at preliminary stages or seek an indeterminate amount of damages, it is possible that the outcome of legal proceedings, including the possible resolution of merchant claims, could have a material impact on our results of operations. In addition, it is possible that significantly increased merchant steering or other actions impairing the Card Member experience could have a material adverse effect on our business. Certain legal proceedings involving us or our subsidiaries are described in this section and others, for which there have been no subsequent material developments since the filing of our 2017 Form 10-K, are described in such report. For additional information, see Note 8 to our Consolidated Financial Statements. In 2010, the Department of Justice, along with Attorneys General from Arizona, Connecticut, Hawaii (Hawaii has since withdrawn its claim), Idaho, Illinois, Iowa, Maryland, Michigan, Missouri, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, Ohio, Rhode Island, Tennessee, Texas, Utah and Vermont filed a complaint in the U.S. District Court for the Eastern District of New York against us alleging a violation of Section 1 of the Sherman Antitrust Act. The complaint included allegations that provisions in our merchant agreements prohibiting merchants from steering a customer to use another network s card or another type of general-purpose card ( anti-steering and non-discrimination contractual provisions) violate the antitrust laws. The complaint sought a judgment permanently enjoining us from enforcing our non-discrimination contractual provisions. The complaint did not seek monetary damages. Following a non-jury trial, the trial court found that the challenged provisions were anticompetitive and on April 30, 2015, the court issued a final judgment entering a permanent injunction. Following our appeal of this judgment, on September 26, 2016, the Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit reversed the trial court decision and judgment in favor of American Express was entered on January 25, 2017. Eleven of the 17 states that are party to the case filed a petition with the Supreme Court seeking a review of the Second Circuit s decision. The Supreme Court granted certiorari and oral argument was held on February 26, 2018 in the case, now captioned Ohio v. American Express Co. On June 25, 2018, the Supreme Court affirmed the judgment of the Second Circuit in favor of American Express. In addition, individual merchant cases and a putative class action, which were consolidated in 2011 and collectively captioned In re: American Express Anti-Steering Rules Antitrust Litigation (II) , are pending in the Eastern District of New York against us alleging that our anti-steering provisions in merchant card acceptance agreements violate U.S. antitrust laws. The individual merchant cases seek damages in unspecified amounts and injunctive relief. Following the Supreme Court decision in Ohio v. American Express Co. in favor of American Express, the Court in the Eastern District of New York granted plaintiffs in the individual merchant cases leave to amend their complaint and trial has been scheduled in the individual merchant cases for April 29, 2019. °Item 1A. RISK FACTORS For a discussion of our risk factors, see Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors of the 2017 Form 10-K. There are no material changes from the risk factors set forth in the 2017 Form 10-K. However, the risks and uncertainties that we face are not limited to those set forth in the 2017 Form 10-K. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or that we currently believe to be immaterial may also adversely affect our business and the trading price of our securities. 65 Table of Contents °Item 2. UNREGISTERED SALES OF EQUITY SECURITIES AND USE OF PROCEEDS (c) ISSUER PURCHASES OF SECURITIES The table below sets forth the information with respect to purchases of our common stock made by or on behalf of us during the three months ended June 30, 2018. 66 Table of Contents °Item 5. OTHER INFORMATION Pursuant to Section 219 of the Iran Threat Reduction and Syria Human Rights Act of 2012, which added Section 13(r) to the Exchange Act, an issuer is required to disclose in its annual or quarterly reports, as applicable, whether it or any of its affiliates knowingly engaged in certain activities, transactions or dealings relating to Iran or with individuals or entities designated pursuant to certain Executive Orders. Disclosure is generally required even where the activities, transactions or dealings were conducted outside the United States by non-U.S. affiliates in compliance with applicable law, and whether or not the activities are sanctionable under U.S. law. American Express Global Business Travel (GBT) and certain entities that may be considered affiliates of GBT have informed us that during the quarter ended June 30, 2018, approximately 45 visas were obtained from Iranian embassies and consulates around the world in connection with certain travel arrangements on behalf of clients, and reservations were booked at one hotel that may be owned, directly or indirectly, or may otherwise be affiliated with, the Government of Iran. GBT had negligible gross revenues and net profits attributable to these transactions and intends to continue to engage in these activities on a limited basis so long as such activities are permitted under U.S. law. °Item 6. EXHIBITS The list of exhibits required to be filed as exhibits to this report are listed on page E-1 hereof, under Exhibit Index which is incorporated herein by reference. 67 Table of Contents SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. 68 Table of Contents EXHIBIT INDEX The following exhibits are filed as part of this Quarterly Report: E-1 